Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.100

Entitlement community grants—Conditions.

The director may make grants of state funds to local governments which qualify as "entitlement communities" under the federal law authorizing community development block grants. These grants may only be made on the condition that the entitlement community provide the director with assurances that it will: (1) Spend the grant moneys for purposes and in a manner which satisfies state constitutional requirements; (2) spend the grant moneys for purposes and in a manner which would satisfy federal requirements; and (3) spend at least the same amount of the grant for loans to businesses from the federal funds received by the entitlement community.

[ 2005 c 136 s 9; 1993 c 512 s 15; 1986 c 204 s 1; 1985 c 164 s 10.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.